Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Mobile Home Sales

190.180.
Definition of terms in KRS 190.180 to 190.250. [Repealed.]

190.190.
License required for mobile home dealers and manufacturers — Application fees — Bond — Report. [Repealed.]

190.200.
Licenses issuance. [Repealed.]

190.210.
Denial, suspension, revocation of license, grounds. [Repealed.]

190.220.
Procedure on denial, suspension or revocation. [Repealed.]

190.230.
Powers of commissioner, hearing — Subpoenas — Witness fees. [Repealed.]

190.240.
Kentucky mobile home dealers license board — Members — Terms — Functions. [Repealed.]

190.250.
Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]